Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1668.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-517 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For purposes of this section, "commercial harvesting
facility" means a privately owned premises managed or engaged on a
Req. No. 12687 Page 1

busi ness basis for the harvesting or hunting of legally acquired and
privately owned cervidae, to include whitetail deer, mule deer or
elk, cervidae hybrids, turkey, exotic species, and exotic hybrid
species for barter, the offer to sell, or for the possession with
intent to sell for profit or monetary gain.
B. No person may propagate or hold in captivity any wildlife
belonging to the state. A commercial harvesting license shall be
issued by the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
to a commercial harvesting facility that applies for the commercial
harvesting license if that commercial harvesting facility complies
with all applicable laws and rules governing the harvesting of
legally acquired cervidae, to include whitetail deer, mule deer and
elk, cervidae hybrids, turkey, exotic species, and exotic hybrid
species harvested in a commercial harvesting facility.
C. Before obtaining a commercial harvesting facility license or
renewal, the applicant shall submit proof that any additional
animals have been secured from a source other than wild stock of
this state.
D. The Secretary of Agriculture, State Veterinarian, or their
designees shall have the authority to inspect a commercial
harvesting facility and its operations at any time if there is
probable cause that a violation has occurred. All other inspections
shall require prior notice as determined in the rule promulgation by
the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry.
Req. No. 12687 Page 2

E. The annual fee for a commercial harvesting facility license
shall be Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00).
F. All licenses issued pursuant to this section shall expire
August 31 of each year and shall replace those issued previously
pursuant to Section 4-106 of Title 29 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
G. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
shall promulgate rules as necessary pursuant to the commercial
harvesting license outlined in this section.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 29 O.S. 2021, Section 4-106, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4-106. A. No person may propagate or hold in captivity
any wildlife or domesticated animals hunted for sport for commercial
hunting area purposes without having first procured a an appropriate
license. An upland game license can be procured from the Director
of the Department of Wildlife Conservation. Licenses shall be
classified as big game, upland game, or a combination of big game
and upland game A commercial harvesting license can be procured from
the Secretary of Agriculture.
1. A big game commercial harvesting license, as created in
Section 1 of this act, shall be required for legally acquired exotic
ungulates, domesticated animals so designated by the Oklahoma
Wildlife Conservation Commission, exotic swine, and legally acquired
whitetail and mule deer, turkey and other species of big game
lawfully taken under the provisions of subsection A of Section 5-411
Req. No. 12687 Page 3

and Section 5-401 of this title. Wildlife that has been crossbred
with exotic wildlife shall be considered native and not exotic
unless documentation shows otherwise.
2. An upland game license shall be required for legally
acquired captive-raised pheasants, all species of quail, Indian
chukars, water fowl, and other similar or suitable gallinaceous
birds; and shall include turkey if no other big game species are
listed on the license/application.
B. Before obtaining a license or a renewal of a license, the
applicant shall submit proof that such wildlife or domesticated
animals hunted for sport will be or have been secured from a source
other than the wild stock in this state. Any person obtaining or
renewing a license shall submit a true and complete inventory of
said animals before a license shall be approved. Each license shall
specifically list the different species and/or subspecies to be
hunted on the listed hunting area or premises.
C. Any game warden of the Oklahoma Department of Wildlife
Conservation shall have authority to inspect any and all records and
invoices pertaining to the commercial hunting operations of any
person licensed or requesting licensure pursuant to this section and
additionally shall have the authority to inspect any and all
facilities, equipment and property connected to the hunting
operation of any person licensed or requesting licensure pursuant to
this section.
Req. No. 12687 Page 4

D. 1. The annual fee for a commercial hunting area license for
upland game under this section shall be One Hundred Dollars
($100.00).
2. The annual fee for a commercial hunting area license for:
a. big game pursuant to this section shall be Two Hundred
Fifty Dollars ($250.00), or
b. a combination of big game and upland game pursuant to
this section shall be Three Hundred Fifty Dollars
($350.00).
E. All licenses issued pursuant to this section shall expire on
June 30 August 1 of each year.
F. D. Exemptions from this license requirement shall be
operators of running pens used for the performance test or training
of dogs. Operators of such running pens may acquire coyotes from
wild stock without having to possess a fur dealer's license for such
purpose and no license shall be required of those involved in
performance testing or training dogs in such running pens so long as
no other wildlife are taken or hunted in any manner.
G. E. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this
section shall be punished by a fine of not less than Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($1,500.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed
sixty (60) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Req. No. 12687 Page 5

H. F. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this
section shall have the commercial hunting area license revoked. No
new license shall be issued for a period of six (6) months from and
after the date on which the revocation order becomes effective.
I. G. The Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry, along
with the Department of Wildlife Conservation, is authorized to
promulgate rules pertaining to commercial hunting areas this
section.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-12687 JL 03/03/25










Req. No. 12687 Page 6